Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.235.155

Federal summer food service program—Administration of funds—Grants.

(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall administer funds for the federal summer food service program.

(2) The superintendent of public instruction may award grants, to the extent funds are appropriated, to eligible organizations to help start new summer food service programs for children or to help expand summer food services for children.

[ 1993 c 333 s 4.]